Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1364.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 34-301, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE34-301. Employment of aliens on public works prohibited; exceptions A. A person who is not a citizen or ward of the United States shall not be employed upon on or in connection with any state, county or municipal works or employment. B. This section shall not be construed to does not prevent the working of prisoners by the this state or a county or municipality thereof of this state on street, road,  or other public work, nor shall the provisions of this section works and does not apply to the employment of any teacher, instructor or professor authorized to teach in the United States under the teacher exchange program as provided by federal statutes or the employment of university or college faculty members. END_STATUTE